Florida, session 2026, SB1638.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âDefending 43 Affordable Prescription Drug Costs Act.â 44 Section 2.âSection 499.061, Florida Statutes, is created to 45 read: 46 499.061âProhibitions against manufacturersâ discriminatory 47 practices relating to 340B drugs and 340B entities.â 48 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 49 (a)ââ340B drugâ means a drug that has been subject to any 50 offer for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 51 s. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42 52 U.S.C. s. 256b(a)(4). 53 (b)ââ340B entityâ means an entity participating or 54 authorized to participate in the 340B Drug Pricing Program, as 55 described in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, including its pharmacy, or any 56 pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense 57 drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 58 (2)âA manufacturer may not: 59 (a)âDeny, restrict, prohibit, or otherwise interfere with, 60 directly or indirectly, the acquisition of a 340B drug by, or 61 delivery of a 340B drug to, a pharmacy that is under contract 62 with a 340B entity and is authorized under such contract to 63 receive and dispense 340B drugs on behalf of the covered entity 64 unless such receipt is prohibited by the United States 65 Department of Health and Human Services; or 66 (b)âInterfere with a pharmacyâs right to contract with a 67 340B entity. 68 (3)âThe commission of any act prohibited by this section is 69 a deceptive and unfair trade practice and constitutes a 70 violation of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices 71 Act under part II of chapter 501, and subjects the violator to 72 all actions, including, but not limited to, investigative 73 demands, remedies, and penalties, provided for in the Florida 74 Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act. 75 (4)âThis section may not be construed to be less 76 restrictive than federal law for a person or entity to which 77 this section applies. This section may not be construed to be in 78 conflict with any of the following: 79 (a)âApplicable federal law or regulations. 80 (b)âOther laws of this state which are compatible with 81 applicable federal law. 82 (5)âLimited distribution of a drug that is subject to a 83 risk evaluation and mitigation strategy under 21 U.S.C. s. 355-1 84 is not a violation of this section. 85 Section 3.âSection 626.8829, Florida Statutes, is created 86 to read: 87 626.8829âReimbursement to 340B entities for 340B drugs.â 88 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 89 (a)ââ340B drugâ means a drug that has been subject to any 90 offer for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 91 s. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42 92 U.S.C. s. 256b(a)(4). 93 (b)ââ340B entityâ means an entity participating or 94 authorized to participate in the 340B Drug Pricing Program, as 95 described in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, including its pharmacy, or any 96 pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense 97 drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 98 (c)ââHealth insurance issuerâ means an entity subject to 99 the insurance laws and regulations of this state, or subject to 100 the jurisdiction of the Commissioner of Insurance Regulation, 101 which contracts, offers to contract, or enters into an agreement 102 to provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of 103 the costs of health care services. The term includes an accident 104 and sickness insurance company, a health maintenance 105 organization, a preferred provider organization or any similar 106 entity, or any other entity providing a plan of health insurance 107 or health benefits. 108 (d)ââPharmacyâ has the same meaning as in s. 465.003. 109 (2)âWith respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for a 110 340B drug, a health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, 111 or other third-party payor, or its agents, may not do any of the 112 following: 113 (a)âReimburse the 340B entity for the 340B drug at a rate 114 lower than that paid for the same drug to non-340B entities or 115 to entities owned or operated by the pharmacy benefit manager on 116 the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug. 117 (b)âImpose any terms or conditions on the 340B entity which 118 differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B 119 entities on the basis that the entity participates in the 340B 120 Drug Pricing Program set forth in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b or that the 121 drug is a 340B drug, including, but not limited to, any of the 122 following terms or conditions: 123 1.âFees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or 124 assessments. As used in this subparagraph, the term âother 125 adjustmentsâ includes, but is not limited to, placing any 126 additional requirements, restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on 127 the 340B entity which result in administrative costs or fees to 128 the 340B entity and which are not placed on non-340B entities, 129 including affiliate pharmacies of the health insurance issuer, 130 pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor. 131 2.âDispensing fees that are less than dispensing fees for 132 non-340B entities. 133 3.âRestrictions or requirements regarding participation in 134 standard or preferred pharmacy networks. 135 4.âRequirements relating to the frequency or scope of 136 audits of inventory management systems. 137 5.âRequirements that a claim for a drug include any 138 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 139 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 140 or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare 141 and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 142 Administration for the administration of the Medicaid program. 143 6.âAny other restrictions, conditions, practices, or 144 policies that are not imposed on non-340B entities. 145 (c)âRequire the 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or 146 clarify a claim after the initial adjudication unless such 147 actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not 148 related to 340B drug pricing. 149 (d)âBase an action or contract requirement solely on the 150 basis that the entity is a participant in the 340B Drug Pricing 151 Program in such a manner that prevents or interferes with any 152 patientâs choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity or 153 its contracted pharmacy, including the creation of a restriction 154 or additional charge on a patient who chooses to receive drugs 155 from a 340B entity or its contracted pharmacy through direct 156 dispensing, delivery, mail order, or administration of such 157 drugs, regardless of the type of insurance coverage or 158 medication. For purposes of this paragraph, it is considered a 159 prohibited practice that prevents or interferes with a patientâs 160 choice to receive drugs from a 340B entity or its contracted 161 pharmacy if a health insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, 162 or other third-party payor places any additional requirements, 163 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on the 340B entity or its 164 contracted pharmacy beyond that of any other pharmacy dispensing 165 medications within the scope of general law, including, but not 166 limited to, requiring a claim for a drug to include any 167 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 168 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 169 or resubmitted, unless it is required by the Centers for 170 Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 171 Administration in administration of the Medicaid program. 172 (e)âRequire or compel the submission of ingredient costs or 173 pricing data pertaining to 340B drugs to any health insurance 174 issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party payor. 175 (f)âExclude the 340B entity from the network of the health 176 insurance issuer, pharmacy benefit manager, or other third-party 177 payor on the basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs subject 178 to an agreement under 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, or refuse to contract 179 with the 340B entity for reasons other than those that apply 180 equally to non-340B entities. 181 (3)âSubsection (2) does not apply to the Medicaid program 182 as payor when Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered 183 outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1396r-8(k). 184 (4)âThe commission of any act prohibited by this section is 185 a deceptive and unfair trade practice, constitutes a violation 186 of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act under 187 part II of chapter 501, and subjects the violator to all 188 actions, including, but not limited to, investigative demands, 189 remedies, and penalties, provided for in the Florida Deceptive 190 and Unfair Trade Practices Act. 191 (5)âThis section may not be construed to be less 192 restrictive than federal law for a person or entity to which 193 this section applies. This section may not be construed to be in 194 conflict with any of the following: 195 (a)âApplicable federal law or regulations. 196 (b)âOther laws of this state that are compatible with 197 applicable federal law. 198 (6)âLimited distribution of a drug that is subject to a 199 risk evaluation and mitigation strategy under 21 U.S.C. s. 355-1 200 is not a violation of this section. 201 Section 4.âSection 627.64743, Florida Statutes, is created 202 to read: 203 627.64743âReimbursement to 340B entities for 340B drugs.â 204 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 205 (a)ââ340B drugâ means a drug that has been subject to any 206 offer for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 207 s. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42 208 U.S.C. s. 256b(a)(4). 209 (b)ââ340B entityâ means an entity participating or 210 authorized to participate in the 340B Drug Pricing Program, as 211 described in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, including its pharmacy, or any 212 pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense 213 drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 214 (c)ââPharmacyâ has the same meaning as in s. 465.003. 215 (d)ââPharmacy benefit managerâ has the same meaning as in 216 s. 627.64741(1). 217 (2)âWith respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for a 218 340B drug, an insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing an 219 individual health insurance policy in this state which provides 220 prescription drug coverage, or a pharmacy benefit manager on 221 behalf of such insurer, may not do any of the following: 222 (a)âReimburse the 340B entity for the 340B drug at a rate 223 lower than that paid for the same drug to non-340B entities on 224 the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug. 225 (b)âImpose any terms or conditions on the 340B entity which 226 differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B 227 entities on the basis that the entity participates in the 340B 228 Drug Pricing Program set forth in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b or that the 229 drug is a 340B drug, including, but not limited to, any of the 230 following terms or conditions: 231 1.âFees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or 232 assessments. As used in this subparagraph, the term âother 233 adjustmentsâ includes, but is not limited to, placing any 234 additional requirements, restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on 235 the 340B entity which result in administrative costs or fees to 236 the 340B entity and which are not placed on non-340B entities, 237 including affiliate pharmacies or in-network pharmacies of the 238 insurer or of the pharmacy benefit manager. 239 2.âDispensing fees that are less than dispensing fees for 240 non-340B entities. 241 3.âRestrictions or requirements regarding participation in 242 standard or preferred pharmacy networks. 243 4.âRequirements relating to the frequency or scope of 244 audits of inventory management systems. 245 5.âRequirements that a claim for a drug include any 246 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 247 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 248 or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare 249 and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 250 Administration for the administration of the Medicaid program. 251 6.âAny other restrictions, conditions, practices, or 252 policies that are not imposed on non-340B entities. 253 (c)âRequire the 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or 254 clarify a claim after the initial adjudication unless such 255 actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not 256 related to 340B drug pricing. 257 (d)âBase an action or a contract requirement solely on the 258 basis that the entity is a participant in the 340B Drug Pricing 259 Program in such a manner that prevents or interferes with a 260 patientâs choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity or 261 its contracted pharmacy, including the creation of a restriction 262 or an additional charge on a patient who chooses to receive 263 drugs from a 340B entity or its contracted pharmacy through 264 direct dispensing, delivery, mail order, or administration of 265 such drugs, regardless of the type of insurance coverage or 266 medication. For purposes of this paragraph, it is considered a 267 prohibited practice that prevents or interferes with a patientâs 268 choice to receive drugs from a 340B entity or its contracted 269 pharmacy if the insurer, or the pharmacy benefit manager on 270 behalf of the insurer, places any additional requirements, 271 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on the 340B entity or its 272 contracted pharmacy beyond that of any other pharmacy dispensing 273 medications within the scope of general law, including, but not 274 limited to, requiring a claim for a drug to include any 275 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 276 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 277 or resubmitted, unless it is required by the Centers for 278 Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 279 Administration in administration of the Medicaid program. 280 (e)âRequire or compel the submission of ingredient costs or 281 pricing data pertaining to 340B drugs to the insurer or the 282 pharmacy benefit manager. 283 (f)âExclude the 340B entity from the network of the insurer 284 or pharmacy benefit manager on the basis that the 340B entity 285 dispenses drugs subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, 286 or refuse to contract with the 340B entity for reasons other 287 than those that apply equally to non-340B entities. 288 (3)âSubsection (2) does not apply to the Medicaid program 289 as payor when Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered 290 outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1396r-8(k). 291 (4)âThe commission of any act prohibited by this section is 292 a deceptive and unfair trade practice, constitutes a violation 293 of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act under 294 part II of chapter 501, and subjects the violator to all 295 actions, including, but not limited to, investigative demands, 296 remedies, and penalties, provided for in the Florida Deceptive 297 and Unfair Trade Practices Act. Each commission of a prohibited 298 act constitutes a violation of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair 299 Trade Practices Act. 300 (5)âThis section may not be construed to be less 301 restrictive than federal law for a person or entity to which 302 this section applies. This section may not be construed to be in 303 conflict with any of the following: 304 (a)âApplicable federal law or federal regulations. 305 (b)âOther laws of this state that are compatible with 306 applicable federal law. 307 (6)âLimited distribution of a drug that is subject to a 308 risk evaluation and mitigation strategy under 21 U.S.C. s. 355-1 309 is not a violation of this section. 310 Section 5.âSection 627.65733, Florida Statutes, is created 311 to read: 312 627.65733âReimbursement to 340B entities for 340B drugs.â 313 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 314 (a)ââ340B drugâ means a drug that has been subject to any 315 offer for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 316 s. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42 317 U.S.C. s. 256b(a)(4). 318 (b)ââ340B entityâ means an entity participating or 319 authorized to participate in the 340B Drug Pricing Program, as 320 described in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, including its pharmacy, or any 321 pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense 322 drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 323 (c)ââPharmacyâ has the same meaning as in s. 465.003. 324 (d)ââPharmacy benefit managerâ has the same meaning as in 325 s. 627.6572(1). 326 (2)âWith respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for 340B 327 drugs, an insurer issuing, delivering, or renewing a group, 328 blanket, or franchise health insurance policy in this state 329 which provides prescription drug coverage, or a pharmacy benefit 330 manager on behalf of such insurer, may not do any of the 331 following: 332 (a)âReimburse the 340B entity for 340B drugs at a rate 333 lower than that paid for the same drug to non-340B entities on 334 the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug. 335 (b)âImpose any terms or conditions on the 340B entity which 336 differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B 337 entities on the basis that the entity participates in the 340B 338 Drug Pricing Program set forth in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b or that a 339 drug is a 340B drug, including, but not limited to, any of the 340 following terms or conditions: 341 1.âFees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or 342 assessments. As used in this subparagraph, the term âother 343 adjustmentsâ includes, but is not limited to, placing any 344 additional requirements, restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on 345 the 340B entity which result in administrative costs or fees to 346 the 340B entity and which are not placed on non-340B entities, 347 including affiliate pharmacies or in-network pharmacies of the 348 insurer or of the pharmacy benefit manager. 349 2.âDispensing fees that are less than dispensing fees for 350 non-340B entities. 351 3.âRestrictions or requirements regarding participation in 352 standard or preferred pharmacy networks. 353 4.âRequirements relating to the frequency or scope of 354 audits of inventory management systems. 355 5.âRequirements that a claim for a drug include any 356 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 357 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 358 or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare 359 and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 360 Administration for the administration of the Medicaid program. 361 6.âAny other restrictions, conditions, practices, or 362 policies that are not imposed on non-340B entities. 363 (c)âRequire the 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or 364 clarify a claim after the initial adjudication unless such 365 actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not 366 related to 340B drug pricing. 367 (d)âBase an action or contract requirement solely on the 368 basis that the entity is a participant in the 340B Drug Pricing 369 Program in such a manner that prevents or interferes with any 370 patientâs choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity or 371 its contracted pharmacy, including the creation of a restriction 372 or additional charge on a patient who chooses to receive drugs 373 from a 340B entity or its contracted pharmacy through direct 374 dispensing, delivery, mail order, or administration of such 375 drugs, regardless of the type of insurance coverage or 376 medication. For purposes of this paragraph, it is considered a 377 prohibited practice that prevents or interferes with a patientâs 378 choice to receive drugs from a 340B entity or its contracted 379 pharmacy if the insurer, or the pharmacy benefit manager on 380 behalf of the insurer, places any additional requirements, 381 restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on the 340B entity beyond 382 that of any other pharmacy dispensing medications within the 383 scope of general law, including, but not limited to, requiring a 384 claim for a drug to include any identification, billing 385 modifier, attestation, or other indication that a drug is a 340B 386 drug in order to be processed or resubmitted, unless it is 387 required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or 388 the Agency for Health Care Administration in administration of 389 the Medicaid program. 390 (e)âRequire or compel the submission of ingredient costs or 391 pricing data pertaining to 340B drugs to the insurer or the 392 pharmacy benefit manager. 393 (f)âExclude the 340B entity from the network of the insurer 394 or pharmacy benefit manager on the basis that the 340B entity 395 dispenses drugs subject to an agreement under 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, 396 or refuse to contract with the 340B entity for reasons other 397 than those that apply equally to non-340B entities. 398 (3)âSubsection (2) does not apply to the Medicaid program 399 as payor when Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered 400 outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1396r-8(k). 401 (4)âThe commission of any act prohibited by this section is 402 a deceptive and unfair trade practice, constitutes a violation 403 of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act under 404 part II of chapter 501, and subjects the violator to all 405 actions, including, but not limited to, investigative demands, 406 remedies, and penalties, provided for in the Florida Deceptive 407 and Unfair Trade Practices Act. Each commission of a prohibited 408 act constitutes a violation of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair 409 Trade Practices Act. 410 (5)âThis section may not be construed to be less 411 restrictive than federal law for a person or entity to which 412 this section applies. This section may not be construed to be in 413 conflict with any of the following: 414 (a)âApplicable federal law or regulations. 415 (b)âOther laws of this state that are compatible with 416 applicable federal law. 417 (6)âLimited distribution of a drug that is subject to a 418 risk evaluation and mitigation strategy under 21 U.S.C. s. 355-1 419 is not a violation of this section. 420 Section 6.âSection 641.31543, Florida Statutes, is created 421 to read: 422 641.31543âReimbursement to 340B entities for 340B drugs.â 423 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 424 (a)ââ340B drugâ means a drug that has been subject to any 425 offer for reduced prices by a manufacturer pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 426 s. 256b and is purchased by a covered entity as defined in 42 427 U.S.C. s. 256b(a)(4). 428 (b)ââ340B entityâ means an entity participating or 429 authorized to participate in the 340B Drug Pricing Program, as 430 described in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, including its pharmacy, or any 431 pharmacy contracted with the participating entity to dispense 432 drugs purchased through the 340B Drug Pricing Program. 433 (c)ââPharmacyâ has the same meaning as in s. 465.003. 434 (d)ââPharmacy benefit managerâ has the same meaning as in 435 s. 641.314(1). 436 (2)âWith respect to reimbursement to a 340B entity for a 437 340B drug, a health maintenance organization issuing, 438 delivering, or renewing a health maintenance contract in this 439 state which provides prescription drug coverage, or a pharmacy 440 benefit manager on behalf of such health maintenance 441 organization, may not do any of the following: 442 (a)âReimburse the 340B entity for the 340B drug at a rate 443 lower than that paid for the same drug to non-340B entities on 444 the basis that the claim is for a 340B drug. 445 (b)âImpose any terms or conditions on the 340B entity which 446 differ from such terms or conditions applied to non-340B 447 entities on the basis that the entity participates in the 340B 448 Drug Pricing Program set forth in 42 U.S.C. s. 256b or that a 449 drug is a 340B drug, including, but not limited to, any of the 450 following terms or conditions: 451 1.âFees, charges, clawbacks, or other adjustments or 452 assessments. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term âother 453 adjustmentsâ includes, but is not limited to, placing any 454 additional requirements, restrictions, or unnecessary burdens on 455 the 340B entity which result in administrative costs or fees to 456 the 340B entity which are not placed on non-340B entities, 457 including affiliate pharmacies or in-network pharmacies of the 458 health maintenance organization or of the pharmacy benefit 459 manager. 460 2.âDispensing of fees that are less than dispensing fees 461 for non-340B entities. 462 3.âRestrictions or requirements regarding participation in 463 standard or preferred pharmacy networks. 464 4.âRequirements relating to the frequency or scope of 465 audits of inventory management systems. 466 5.âRequirements that a claim for a drug include any 467 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 468 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 469 or resubmitted unless it is required by the Centers for Medicare 470 and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 471 Administration for the administration of the Medicaid program. 472 6.âAny other restrictions, conditions, practices, or 473 policies that are not imposed on non-340B entities. 474 (c)âRequire the 340B entity to reverse, resubmit, or 475 clarify a claim after the initial adjudication unless such 476 actions are in the normal course of pharmacy business and not 477 related to 340B drug pricing. 478 (d)âBase an action or contract requirement solely on the 479 basis that the entity is a participant in the 340B Drug Pricing 480 Program in such a manner that prevents or interferes with any 481 patientâs choice to receive such drugs from the 340B entity or 482 its contracted pharmacy, including the creation of a restriction 483 or additional charge on a patient who chooses to receive drugs 484 from a 340B entity or its contracted pharmacy through direct 485 dispensing, delivery, mail order, or administration of such 486 drugs, regardless of the type of insurance coverage or 487 medication. For purposes of this paragraph, it is considered a 488 prohibited practice that prevents or interferes with a patientâs 489 choice to receive drugs from a 340B entity or its contracted 490 pharmacy if the health maintenance organization, or the pharmacy 491 benefit manager on behalf of the health maintenance 492 organization, places any additional requirements, restrictions, 493 or unnecessary burdens on the 340B entity or its contracted 494 pharmacy beyond that of any other pharmacy dispensing 495 medications within the scope of general law, including, but not 496 limited to, requiring a claim for a drug to include any 497 identification, billing modifier, attestation, or other 498 indication that a drug is a 340B drug in order to be processed 499 or resubmitted, unless it is required by the Centers for 500 Medicare and Medicaid Services or the Agency for Health Care 501 Administration in administration of the Medicaid program. 502 (e)âRequire or compel the submission of ingredient costs or 503 pricing data pertaining to 340B drugs to the health maintenance 504 organization or the pharmacy benefit manager. 505 (f)âExclude the 340B entity from the network of the health 506 maintenance organization or pharmacy benefit manager on the 507 basis that the 340B entity dispenses drugs subject to an 508 agreement under 42 U.S.C. s. 256b, or refuse to contract with 509 the 340B entity for reasons other than those that apply equally 510 to non-340B entities. 511 (3)âSubsection (2) does not apply to the Medicaid program 512 as payor when Medicaid provides reimbursement for covered 513 outpatient drugs as defined in 42 U.S.C. s. 1396r-8(k). 514 (4)âThe commission of any act prohibited by this section is 515 a deceptive and unfair trade practice, constitutes a violation 516 of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices Act under 517 part II of chapter 501, and subjects the violator to all 518 actions, including, but not limited to, investigative demands, 519 remedies, and penalties, provided for in the Florida Deceptive 520 and Unfair Trade Practices Act. Each commission of a prohibited 521 act constitutes a violation of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair 522 Trade Practices Act. 523 (5)âThis section may not be construed to be less 524 restrictive than federal law for a person or entity to which 525 this section applies. This section may not be construed to be in 526 conflict with any of the following: 527 (a)âApplicable federal law or regulations. 528 (b)âOther laws of this state that are compatible with 529 applicable federal law. 530 (6)âLimited distribution of a drug that is subject to a 531 risk evaluation and mitigation strategy under 21 U.S.C. s. 355-1 532 is not a violation of this section. 533 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.